Maryland, session 2026, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ATHLETIC ACTIVITY” INCLUDES INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETICS:
(I) IN WHICH A STUDENT MAY PARTICIPATE OUTSIDE OF
REGULAR SCHOOL HOURS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1043*

HOUSE BILL 1043
(II) FOR WHICH A STUDENT DOES NOT EARN ACADEMIC CREDIT.
(3) (I) “HOMESCHOOL STUDENT” MEANS A STUDENT WHO
PARTICIPATES IN A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF COMAR 13A.10.01.01.
(II) “HOMESCHOOL STUDENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A STUDENT
WHO PARTICIPATES IN A HOME INSTRUCTION PROGRAM THAT IS UNDERGOING A
DEFICIENCY CORRECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMAR 13A.10.01.03.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL MAY ALLOW A
HOMESCHOOL STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL TO PARTICIPATE IN
AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY THE SCHOOL TO THE SAME EXTENT THAT A
STUDENT WHO IS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY.
(2) A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SHALL GIVE PLACEMENT PRIORITY TO A
STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SPONSORING THE ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY OVER A STUDENT WHO IS NOT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IF
THERE ARE A LIMITED NUMBER OF SPACES AVAILABLE FOR STUDENTS IN THE
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY.
(C) (1) A HOMESCHOOL STUDENT MAY PARTICIPATE IN AN ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY SPONSORED:
(I) BY THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL THE HOMESCHOOL STUDENT
WOULD BE ASSIGNED TO ATTEND IF THE HOMESCHOOL STUDENT ATTENDED PUBLIC
SCHOOL; OR
(II) FOR A HOMESCHOOL STUDENT WHO LIVES IN AN AREA THAT
DOES NOT ASSIGN STUDENTS TO A SPECIFIC SCHOOL, BY A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL
THAT IS GEOGRAPHICALLY PROXIMATE WITH THE HOMESCHOOL STUDENT’S
RESIDENCE AS DETERMINED BY THE RELEVANT COUNTY BOARD.
(2) IF THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL AT WHICH A HOMESCHOOL STUDENT
MAY PARTICIPATE IN AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY DOES NOT OFFER THE ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY IN WHICH THE HOMESCHOOL STUDENT WOULD LIKE TO PARTICIPATE, THE
HOMESCHOOL STUDENT MAY USE THE SAME METHODS THAT A STUDENT ENROLLED
IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL USES TO PARTICIPATE IN ANOTHER PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL’S ATHLETIC ACTIVITIES.

HOUSE BILL 1043 3
(3) A STUDENT ENROLLED IN A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL WHO
WITHDRAWS FROM THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL TO BEGIN A HOME INSTRUCTION
PROGRAM IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SPONSORED
BY ANY PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IF THE STUDENT, WHILE ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL, WAS SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINARY ACTION THAT WOULD BAR
PARTICIPATION IN THE ATHLETIC ACTIVITY.
(D) A HOMESCHOOL STUDENT WHO PARTICIPATES IN AN ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IS:
(1) SUBJECT TO:
(I) THE SAME INSURANCE, HEALTH, AND IMMUNIZATION
REQUIREMENTS AND EXEMPTIONS AS A STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL; AND
(II) EXCEPT FOR ACADEMIC RULES, THE SAME CODES OF
CONDUCT AND SAFETY RULES AS A STUDENT ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL; AND
(2) RESPONSIBLE FOR TRANSPORTATION TO AND FROM THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL.
(E) (1) IF A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL HAS LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR
ATHLETIC ACTIVITIES, THE LIABILITY INSURANCE SHALL COVER HOMESCHOOL
STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL TO THE SAME EXTENT AS THE COVERAGE FOR STUDENTS ENROLLED
IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL.
(2) A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL MAY REQUIRE A HOMESCHOOL STUDENT
PARTICIPATING IN AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SPONSORED BY THE PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL TO TAKE THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS IF THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL REQUIRES
STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL TO TAKE THE SAME ACTIONS:
(I) PAY INSURANCE PREMIUMS;
(II) SIGN WAIVERS; OR
(III) SHOW PROOF OF LIABILITY INSURANCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.